Florida, session 2026, SB822.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âParagraph (g) of subsection (3) of section 25 718.111, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 26 718.111âThe association.â 27 (3)âPOWER TO MANAGE CONDOMINIUM PROPERTY AND TO CONTRACT, 28 SUE, AND BE SUED; CONFLICT OF INTEREST.â 29 (g)âIf an association contracts with a community 30 association manager or a community association management firm, 31 the community association manager or community association 32 management firm must possess all applicable licenses required by 33 part VIII of chapter 468. An association with total annual 34 revenues of $750,000 or more and consisting of 100 or more units 35 must contract with a community association management firm or a 36 community association manager certified by the Community 37 Association Managers International Certification Board as a 38 Certified Manager of Community Associations or by the Community 39 Associations Institute as an Association Management Specialist 40 or a Professional Community Association Manager. Each board 41 member or officer All board members or officers of an 42 association that contracts with a community association manager 43 or a community association management firm has have a duty to 44 ensure that the community association manager or community 45 association management firm is properly licensed and certified 46 before entering into a contract. 47 Section 2.âSubsection (6) is added to section 718.405, 48 Florida Statutes, to read: 49 718.405âMulticondominiums; multicondominium associations.â 50 (6)âAn association operating a multicondominium with total 51 annual revenues of $750,000 or more and consisting of 100 or 52 more units must contract with a community association management 53 firm or a community association manager certified by the 54 Community Association Managers International Certification Board 55 as a Certified Manager of Community Associations or by the 56 Community Associations Institute as an Association Management 57 Specialist or a Professional Community Association Manager. The 58 community association manager or community association 59 management firm must possess all applicable licenses required by 60 part VIII of chapter 468. Each board member or officer of an 61 association that contracts with a community association manager 62 or a community association management firm has a duty to ensure 63 that the community association manager or community association 64 management firm is properly licensed and certified before 65 entering into a contract. 66 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 67 719.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 68 719.106âBylaws; cooperative ownership.â 69 (1)âMANDATORY PROVISIONS.âThe bylaws or other cooperative 70 documents shall provide for the following, and if they do not, 71 they shall be deemed to include the following: 72 (a)âAdministration.â 73 1.âThe form of administration of the association shall be 74 described, indicating the titles of the officers and board of 75 administration and specifying the powers, duties, manner of 76 selection and removal, and compensation, if any, of officers and 77 board members. In the absence of such a provision, the board of 78 administration shall be composed of five members, unless the 79 cooperative has five or fewer units. The board shall be composed 80 consist of not fewer than three members in cooperatives with 81 five or fewer units that are not-for-profit corporations. In a 82 residential cooperative association of more than 10 units, co 83 owners of a unit may not serve as members of the board of 84 directors at the same time unless the co-owners own more than 85 one unit or unless there are not enough eligible candidates to 86 fill the vacancies on the board at the time of the vacancy. In 87 the absence of provisions to the contrary, the board of 88 administration shall have a president, a secretary, and a 89 treasurer, who shall perform the duties of those offices 90 customarily performed by officers of corporations. Unless 91 prohibited in the bylaws, the board of administration may 92 appoint other officers and grant them those duties it deems 93 appropriate. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the 94 officers shall serve without compensation and at the pleasure of 95 the board. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the members 96 of the board shall serve without compensation. 97 2.âA person who has been suspended or removed by the 98 division under this chapter, or who is delinquent in the payment 99 of any monetary obligation due to the association, is not 100 eligible to be a candidate for board membership and may not be 101 listed on the ballot. A director or officer charged by 102 information or indictment with a felony theft or embezzlement 103 offense involving the associationâs funds or property is 104 suspended from office. The board shall fill the vacancy 105 according to general law until the end of the period of the 106 suspension or the end of the directorâs term of office, 107 whichever occurs first. However, if the charges are resolved 108 without a finding of guilt or without acceptance of a plea of 109 guilty or nolo contendere, the director or officer shall be 110 reinstated for any remainder of his or her term of office. A 111 member who has such criminal charges pending may not be 112 appointed or elected to a position as a director or officer. A 113 person who has been convicted of any felony in this state or in 114 any United States District Court, or who has been convicted of 115 any offense in another jurisdiction which would be considered a 116 felony if committed in this state, is not eligible for board 117 membership unless such felonâs civil rights have been restored 118 for at least 5 years as of the date such person seeks election 119 to the board. The validity of an action by the board is not 120 affected if it is later determined that a board member is 121 ineligible for board membership due to having been convicted of 122 a felony. 123 3.âWhen a unit owner files a written inquiry by certified 124 mail with the board of administration, the board shall respond 125 in writing to the unit owner within 30 days after of receipt of 126 the inquiry. The boardâs response shall either give a 127 substantive response to the inquirer, notify the inquirer that a 128 legal opinion has been requested, or notify the inquirer that 129 advice has been requested from the division. If the board 130 requests advice from the division, the board shall, within 10 131 days after of its receipt of the advice, provide in writing a 132 substantive response to the inquirer. If a legal opinion is 133 requested, the board shall, within 60 days after the receipt of 134 the inquiry, provide in writing a substantive response to the 135 inquirer. The failure to provide a substantive response to the 136 inquirer as provided herein precludes the board from recovering 137 attorneyâs fees and costs in any subsequent litigation, 138 administrative proceeding, or arbitration arising out of the 139 inquiry. The association may, through its board of 140 administration, adopt reasonable rules and regulations regarding 141 the frequency and manner of responding to the unit ownersâ 142 inquiries, one of which may be that the association is obligated 143 to respond to only one written inquiry per unit in any given 30 144 day period. In such case, any additional inquiry or inquiries 145 must be responded to in the subsequent 30-day period, or 146 periods, as applicable. 147 4.âAn association with total annual revenues of $750,000 or 148 more and consisting of 100 or more units must contract with a 149 community association management firm or a community association 150 manager certified by the Community Association Managers 151 International Certification Board as a Certified Manager of 152 Community Associations or by the Community Associations 153 Institute as an Association Management Specialist or a 154 Professional Community Association Manager. The community 155 association manager or community association management firm 156 must possess all applicable licenses required by part VIII of 157 chapter 468. 158 5.âEach board member or officer of an association that 159 contracts with a community association manager or a community 160 association management firm has a duty to ensure that the 161 community association manager or community association 162 management firm is properly licensed and certified before 163 entering into a contract. 164 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 720.303, Florida 165 Statutes, is amended to read: 166 720.303âAssociation powers and duties; meetings of board; 167 official records; budgets; financial reporting; association 168 funds; recalls.â 169 (1)âPOWERS AND DUTIES.âAn association that operates a 170 community as defined in s. 720.301 must be operated by an 171 association that is a Florida corporation. After October 1, 172 1995, the association must be incorporated and the initial 173 governing documents must be recorded in the official records of 174 the county in which the community is located. An association may 175 operate more than one community. An association with total 176 annual revenues of $750,000 or more and consisting of 100 or 177 more parcels must contract with a community association 178 management firm or a community association manager certified by 179 the Community Association Managers International Certification 180 Board as a Certified Manager of Community Associations or by the 181 Community Associations Institute as an Association Management 182 Specialist or a Professional Community Association Manager. The 183 community association manager or community association 184 management firm must possess all applicable licenses required by 185 part VIII of chapter 468. The officers and directors of an 186 association are subject to s. 617.0830 and have a fiduciary 187 relationship to the members who are served by the association. 188 Each officer and director of an association that contracts with 189 a community association manager or a community association 190 management firm has a duty to ensure that the community 191 association manager or community association management firm is 192 properly licensed and certified before entering into a contract. 193 The powers and duties of an association include those set forth 194 in this chapter and, except as expressly limited or restricted 195 in this chapter, those set forth in the governing documents. 196 After control of the association is obtained by members other 197 than the developer, the association may institute, maintain, 198 settle, or appeal actions or hearings in its name on behalf of 199 all members concerning matters of common interest to the 200 members, including, but not limited to, the common areas; roof 201 or structural components of a building, or other improvements 202 for which the association is responsible; mechanical, 203 electrical, or plumbing elements serving an improvement or 204 building for which the association is responsible; 205 representations of the developer pertaining to any existing or 206 proposed commonly used facility; and protest of ad valorem taxes 207 on commonly used facilities. The association may defend actions 208 in eminent domain or bring inverse condemnation actions. Before 209 commencing litigation against any party in the name of the 210 association involving amounts in controversy in excess of 211 $100,000, the association must obtain the affirmative approval 212 of a majority of the voting interests at a meeting of the 213 membership at which a quorum has been attained. This subsection 214 does not limit any statutory or common-law right of any 215 individual member or class of members to bring any action 216 without participation by the association. A member does not have 217 authority to act for the association by virtue of being a 218 member. An association may have more than one class of members 219 and may issue membership certificates. An association of 15 or 220 fewer parcel owners may enforce only the requirements of those 221 deed restrictions established prior to the purchase of each 222 parcel upon an affected parcel owner or owners. 223 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.